Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 9
PREPARATION FOR TRIAL

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 SUBPOENAS

PART 2 WITNESSES FROM OUTSIDE THE STATE

PART 3 COMPELLING ATTENDANCE
OF MATERIAL WITNESSES
WITHIN THE STATE

PART 4 PRETRIAL MOTIONS IN CLASS 1
FELONY CASES ALLEGING
THAT A DEFENDANT IS
A MENTALLY RETARDED DEFENDANT

PART 5 MOTIONS ALLEGING
AN UNCONSTITUTIONAL LAW

PART 6 PROHIBITION ON
REPRODUCTION OF
SEXUALLY EXPLOITATIVE MATERIAL

PART 7 DISCOVERY PROJECT STEERING COMMITTEE